Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $900,101
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Public Records Advocate.
SECTION 2.
This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
Passed by House April 14, 2023
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate April 26, 2023
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5032 (HB 5032-A) Page 1